Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.180

Legislative records—Construction—Confidentiality of bill drafting records.

The provisions of RCW 40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through 40.14.180 shall not be construed as repealing or modifying any other acts or parts of acts authorizing the retention or destruction of public records nor shall RCW 40.14.010 and 40.14.100 through 40.14.180 affect the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring the deposit of all state publications in the state library nor shall it affect the confidentiality of the bill drafting records of the code reviser's office.

[ 1983 c 3 s 85; 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 10.]